Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of State Police, for the  biennium
beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Patrol Services, Criminal
Investigations and Gaming
Enforcement ............................. $242,565,328
(2) Fish and Wildlife
Enforcement ............................. $ 12,055,355
(3) Forensic Services and
Chief Medical Examiner ............ $ 73,320,088
(4) Administrative Services,
Agency Support and Criminal
Justice Information Services .... $115,293,350
(5) Debt Service.............................. $ 16,764,730
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of State
Police, for the following purposes:
(1) Patrol Services, Criminal
Investigations and Gaming
Enforcement ............................. $ 49,647,011
(2) Fish and Wildlife
Enforcement ............................. $ 36,737,504
(3) Forensic Services and
Chief Medical Examiner ............ $ 3,882,981
(4) Administrative Services,
Agency Support and Criminal
Justice Information Services .... $ 32,425,146
Enrolled Senate Bill 5530 (SB 5530-A) Page 1
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Department of State Police  for
the following purposes:
(1) Patrol Services and Criminal
Investigations............................ $ 2,001,619
(2) Fish and Wildlife
Enforcement ............................. $ 2,898,534
(3) Forensic Services ...................... $ 4,001,932
(4) Administrative Services,
Agency Support and Criminal
Justice Information Services .... $ 5,677,314
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$11,571,935 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses  from moneys allocated from the Parks and Natural Resources Fund to
the Department of State Police for fish and wildlife enforcement activities.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$2,500,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of State Police  from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the  Department of State Police, for deferred main-
tenance, capital project costs and safety improvements.
SECTION 6. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5530 (SB 5530-A) Page 2